Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.810

Opioid drugs—Right to refuse.

By January 1, 2020, the board must adopt or amend its rules to require osteopathic physicians who prescribe opioids to inform patients of their right to refuse an opioid prescription or order for any reason. If a patient indicates a desire to not receive an opioid, the osteopathic physician must document the patient's request and avoid prescribing or ordering opioids, unless the request is revoked by the patient.

[ 2019 c 314 s 5.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.